Washington statutes.
RCW 39.19.075

Compliance with goals—Valuation of goods or services.

For purposes of measuring an agency's or educational institution's goal attainment, any regulations adopted under RCW 39.19.030(7)(e) must provide that if a certified minority and women's business enterprise is a broker of goods or materials required under a contract, the contracting agency or educational institution may count only the dollar value of the fee or commission charged and not the value of goods or materials provided. The contracting agency or educational institution may, at its discretion, fix the dollar value of the fee or commission charged at either the actual dollar value of the fee or commission charged or at a standard percentage of the total value of the brokered goods, which percentage must reflect the fees or commissions generally paid to brokers for providing such services.

[ 1996 c 69 s 6.]

NOTES:

Intent—1996 c 69: See note following RCW 39.19.030.